Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.145, is amended to read: 144.145 FLUORIDATION OF MUNICIPAL WATER SUPPLIES. new text begin (a) new text end For the purpose of promoting public health through prevention of tooth decay, the person, firm, corporation, or municipality having jurisdiction over a deleted text begin municipaldeleted text end new text begin publicnew text end water supply, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, shall controlnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) whether to fluoridate the public water supply; and new text end new text begin (2) new text end the quantities of fluoride in the water new text begin in a public water supply that opts to fluoridate new text end so as to maintain a fluoride content new text begin that is within the parameters new text end prescribed by the deleted text begin statedeleted text end commissioner of health. deleted text begin In the manner provided by law,deleted text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a person, firm, corporation, or municipality having jurisdiction over a public water supply must not fluoridate water that contains naturally occurring fluoride within the parameters for fluoride content established by the commissioner of health in rule. new text end new text begin (c)new text end The deleted text begin statedeleted text end commissioner of health shallnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end promulgate rules new text begin according to chapter 14 new text end relating to the fluoridation of public water supplies deleted text begin which shalldeleted text end new text begin that opt to fluoridate. The rules mustnew text end include, but new text begin are new text end not deleted text begin bedeleted text end limited to the following: new text begin (i) parameters for fluoride content; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end the means by which fluoride is controlled; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end the methods of testing the fluoride content; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end the records to be kept relating to fluoridationdeleted text begin . The state commissioner of health shalldeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2)new text end enforce deleted text begin the provisions ofdeleted text end this sectionnew text begin and rules adopted under this section for public water supplies that opt to fluoridatenew text end . deleted text begin In so doing the commissioner shall require the fluoridation of water in all municipal water supplies on or before January 1, 1970. The state commissioner of health shall not require the fluoridation of water in any municipal water supply where such water supply in the state of nature contains sufficient fluorides to conform with the rules of such commissioner.deleted text end new text begin (d) The commissioner of health is prohibited from requiring fluoridation of public water supplies. new text end